fst/conjunctions.lexc
! Conjunctions — handwritten

LEXICON Conjunctions
  be+Conj+Sg+Nom:be            # ;
  adder+Conj+Sg+Nom:adder      # ;
  kaddan+Conj+Sg+Nom:kaddan    # ;
  anga+Conj+Sg+Nom:anga        # ;
  angā+Conj+Sg+Nom:angā        # ;
  kwei+Conj+Sg+Nom:kwei        # ;
  jaī+Conj+Sg+Nom:jaī          # ;
  nī+Conj+Sg+Nom:nī            # ;
  beggi+Conj+Sg+Nom:beggi      # ;
  paggan+Conj+Sg+Nom:paggan    # ;
